Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-401
Legislative Council; members; functions.

There is hereby created a Legislative Council, hereinafter referred to as council, which shall consist of all of the members of the Legislature. It shall be the function of the Legislative Council to consider legislative policies between sessions of the Legislature and carry out the duties imposed by section 50-402.

Laws 1937, c. 118, § 1, p. 421;

Laws 1939, c. 60, § 1, p. 261;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 50-501;

Laws 1943, c. 118, § 1, p. 413;

R.S.1943, § 50-401;

Laws 1949, c. 168, § 1(1), p. 444.